trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
abatés/PZ
absolia/OZ
abstreia/OZ
aclariré/MNZ
aconduiré/MNZ
acreixia/OZ
acreixés/PZ
adduiré/MNZ
admetia/OZ
admetés/PZ
adscrivia/OZ
afebliré/MNZ
afluiré/MNZ
agemoliré/MNZ
aguerriré/MNZ
aiguabatia/OZ
aiguabatés/PZ
ajeia/OZ
alabatia/OZ
alabatés/PZ
amagriré/MNZ
amoixiré/MNZ
amortiré/MNZ
apercebia/OZ
apercebés/PZ
aprehenia/OZ
aprenia/OZ
aprofundiré/MNZ
arremetia/OZ
arremetés/PZ
arrodoniré/MNZ
assaboriré/MNZ
asseia/OZ
assistiré/MNZ
assumiré/MNZ
atenia/OZ
atenyia/OZ
atenyés/PZ
atoniré/MNZ
atreia/OZ
atuiré/MNZ
averriré/MNZ
bandiré/MN
batia/DO
batés/P
beneiré/MN
bestreia/O
bevia/O
boquiré/MN
botia/O
botés/P
brumiré/MN
buixiré/MN
cabia/O
cabés/P
calia/O
canusiré/MN
carvenia/O
cenyiré/MN
cernia/O
cernés/P
circumscrivia/O
cloïa/O
coerciré/MN
colia/O
colltorcia/O
colltorcés/P
col·legiré/MN
combatia/O
combatés/P
cometia/O
cometés/P
commovia/O
compareixia/O
compartiré/MN
complanyia/O
complanyés/P
compliré/MN
comprenia/O
comprometés/P
concebia/O
concebés/P
concediré/MN
condoldia/O
condoliré/MN
conferiré/MN
confonia/O
constituiré/MN
constrenyés/P
contenia/O
contorcés/P
contrabatia/O
contrabatés/P
contribuiré/MN
convencia/O
convencés/P
coproduiré/MN
corfonia/O
corresponia/O
corrompés/P
coïa/O
creia/O
creixia/O
creixés/P
cruspiré/MN
debatés/P
decebia/O
decebés/P
decidiré/MN
decreixés/P
defenia/O
definiré/MN
delinquiré/MN
demetés/P
depenia/O
deperiré/MN
desadheriré/MN
desapareixia/O
desatenia/O
desbastiré/MN
descoloriré/MN
descomponia/O
descomprometés/P
desconeixia/O
descrivia/O
desembadaliré/MN
desemmandriré/MN
desempobriré/MN
desencongiré/MN
desenfelloniré/MN
desengreviré/MN
desenllepoliré/MN
desensuperbiré/MN
desentristiré/MN
desfloriré/MN
desistiré/MN
desmereixia/O
desmereixés/P
desnodriré/MN
desompliré/MN
desplaia/O
desprenia/O
desproveiré/MN
destenyiré/MN
destorcés/P
destrenyia/O
destrenyés/P
desvergonyiré/MN
detreia/O
diferiré/MN
difonia/O
dimitiré/MN
discutiré/MN
dissuadiré/MN
distenia/O
distorcés/P
distreia/O
divertiré/MN
eixobriré/MNZ
elidiré/MNZ
embajaniré/MNZ
embelliré/MNZ
embevia/OZ
emboniquiré/MNZ
embraviré/MNZ
emergiré/MNZ
emetés/PZ
emmaluriré/MNZ
emmelangiré/MNZ
empagesiré/MNZ
empenyia/OZ
empenyés/PZ
emperesiré/MNZ
empoltroniré/MNZ
enagriré/MNZ
encabiré/MNZ
encanudiré/MNZ
encenia/OZ
encobriré/MNZ
encongiré/MNZ
endobliré/MNZ
enfereiré/MNZ
enfondia/OZ
enfondés/PZ
enfortiré/MNZ
engalvaniré/MNZ
engordiré/MNZ
enguerxiré/MNZ
enlluentiré/MNZ
enrellentiré/MNZ
enseguiré/MNZ
entebeiré/MNZ
entrebatia/OZ
entrebatés/PZ
entreferiré/MNZ
entremetés/PZ
entreplovia/OZ
envaniré/MNZ
envilaniré/MNZ
esbargiré/MNZ
esbatia/OZ
esbatés/PZ
escatiré/MNZ
escometés/PZ
escrivia/OZ
esgrimiré/MNZ
espenyés/PZ
espoltriré/MNZ
espremia/OZ
espremés/PZ
estatuiré/MNZ
estenia/OZ
estorcés/PZ
estrenyia/OZ
estrenyés/PZ
evadiré/MNZ
eximiré/MNZ
extradiré/MNZ
extreia/OZ
fenyia/O
fenyés/P
flectiré/MN
fotia/O
fotés/P
frunziré/MN
fumés/P
guariré/MN
heuia/OZ
heués/PZ
imprimiré/MNZ
infonia/OZ
infringiré/MNZ
insurgiré/MNZ
interrompia/OZ
interrompés/PZ
investiré/MNZ
ireixés/PZ
irrompia/OZ
irrompés/PZ
lleia/O
malmetia/O
malmetés/P
malpariré/MN
malvenia/O
malveués/P
malvivia/O
manumetia/O
manumetés/P
menyscreia/O
mereixés/P
metia/O
metés/P
movia/O
mugiré/MN
només/P
noïa/O
obstruiré/MNZ
ometia/OZ
ometés/PZ
pariré/MN
peixia/O
peixés/P
percebés/P
perdia/O
perdés/P
permetés/P
pernabatia/O
pernabatés/P
perquiriré/MN
pertanyés/P
pervivia/O
planyia/O
planyés/P
ponia/O
posseiré/MN
premés/P
prenia/O
presidiré/MN
pretenia/O
prometia/O
prometés/P
propel·liré/MN
prorrompia/O
prorrompés/P
queia/O
radiodirigiré/MN
reabsolia/O
readmetés/P
reapareixia/O
rebatés/P
rebevia/O
rebotia/O
rebotés/P
rebés/P
recomponia/O
recondiré/MN
recoïa/O
recreixés/P
redargüiré/MN
reescrivia/O
referiré/MN
reia/O
reimprimiré/MN
relluiré/MN
remetés/P
remolia/O
repetiré/MN
reprenia/O
residiré/MN
responia/O
restrenyés/P
retenyiré/MN
retia/O
retorcia/O
retorcés/P
retransmetés/P
retreia/O
retrovenia/O
retés/P
revel·liré/MN
revencés/P
revenia/O
romania/O
rompés/P
salprenia/O
sargiré/MN
sobrecreixia/O
sobrecreixés/P
sobreescrivia/O
sobreseia/O
sobreteixiré/MN
sobrevivia/O
somovia/O
sorprenia/O
sotaescrivia/O
sotbatés/P
sotmetia/O
sotmetés/P
substituiré/MN
suprimiré/MN
suspenia/O
temés/P
terratremia/O
terratremés/P
tonia/O
torcés/P
trametia/O
trametés/P
transcendiré/MN
transfonia/O
transmetés/P
treia/O
tremés/P
tripartiré/MN
ullprenia/OZ
vencia/O
vencés/P
vilteniré/MN
vivia/O
